Washington statutes.
RCW 15.76.120

Categories of fairs.

The following categories of agricultural fairs held in the state may be eligible for state allocations:

(1) Area fairs, which serve an area larger than one county; have both open and junior participation and an extensive diversification of classes, displays, and exhibits; and are not under county commissioner jurisdiction;

(2) County fairs, organized to serve the interests of single counties; have both open and junior participation but not as extensive diversification of classes, displays, and exhibits as area fairs; and are under county commissioner jurisdiction. An individual county must have no more than one county fair, but the county commissioners of two or more counties, by resolution, may jointly sponsor a county or district fair as limited by RCW 36.37.050;

(3) Community fairs, which serve an area smaller than area or county fairs and have either or both open or junior classes, displays, or exhibits. There may be more than one community fair in a county; and

(4) Youth shows and fairs, which serve three or more counties, have the purpose of educating and training rural youth in matters of rural living, and are approved under the authority of the Washington State University or the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2018 c 280 s 4; 1993 c 163 s 1; 1991 c 238 s 74; 1961 c 61 s 3.]